bbl_pronouns.lexd
LEXICON Pronoun
<1><sg><abs>:so
<1><sg><erg>:as
<1><sg>><dat>:so>n
<1><sg>><gen>:se>ⁿ
<1><sg>><cont>:so>x
<1><sg><lat>:so
<1><sg>><ad><lat>:so>gŏ
<1><sg>><inter><lat>:so>lŏ
<1><sg><ess>:so
<1><sg>><ad><ess>:so>go
<1><sg>><inter><ess>:so>lo
<1><sg>><abl>:so>reⁿ
<1><sg>><ad>><abl>:so>go>reⁿ
<1><sg>><inter>><abl>:so>lo>reⁿ
<1><sg>><trans>:so>ğ
<1><sg>><ad>><trans>:so>go>ğ
<1><sg>><inter>><trans>:so>lo>ğ
<1><sg>><term>:so>mciⁿ
<1><sg>><ad>><term>:so>go>mciⁿ
<1><sg>><inter>><term>:so>lo>mciⁿ
<1><sg>><apud><lat>:so>guiħ
<1><sg>><apud><ess>:so>ciⁿ
<1><sg>><apud><abl>:so>xiⁿ
<2><sg><abs>:ħo
<2><sg><erg>:aħ
<2><sg>><dat>:ħo>n
<2><sg>><gen>:ħe>ⁿ
<2><sg>><cont>:ħo>x
<2><sg><lat>:ħo
<2><sg>><ad><lat>:ħo>gŏ
<2><sg>><inter><lat>:ħo>lŏ
<2><sg><ess>:ħo
<2><sg>><ad><ess>:ħo>go
<2><sg>><inter><ess>:ħo>lo
<2><sg>><abl>:ħo>reⁿ
<2><sg>><ad>><abl>:ħo>go>reⁿ
<2><sg>><inter>><abl>:ħo>lo>reⁿ
<2><sg>><trans>:ħo>ğ
<2><sg>><ad>><trans>:ħo>go>ğ
<2><sg>><inter>><trans>:ħo>lo>ğ
<2><sg>><term>:ħo>mciⁿ
<2><sg>><ad>><term>:ħo>go>mciⁿ
<2><sg>><inter>><term>:ħo>lo>mciⁿ
<2><sg>><apud><lat>:ħo>guiħ
<2><sg>><apud><ess>:ħo>ciⁿ
<2><sg>><apud><abl>:ħo>xiⁿ
<1><pl><excl><abs>:txo
<1><pl><excl><erg>:atx
<1><pl><excl>><dat>:txo>n
<1><pl><excl>><gen>:txe>ⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><cont>:txo>x
<1><pl><excl><lat>:txo
<1><pl><excl>><ad><lat>:txo>gŏ
<1><pl><excl>><inter><lat>:txo>lŏ
<1><pl><excl><ess>:txo
<1><pl><excl>><ad><ess>:txo>go
<1><pl><excl>><inter><ess>:txo>lo
<1><pl><excl>><abl>:txo>reⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><ad>><abl>:txo>go>reⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><inter>><abl>:txo>lo>reⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><trans>:txo>ğ
<1><pl><excl>><ad>><trans>:txo>go>ğ
<1><pl><excl>><inter>><trans>:txo>lo>ğ
<1><pl><excl>><term>:txo>mciⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><ad>><term>:txo>go>mciⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><inter>><term>:txo>lo>mciⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><apud><lat>:txo>guiħ
<1><pl><excl>><apud><ess>:txo>ciⁿ
<1><pl><excl>><apud><abl>:txo>xiⁿ
<1><pl><incl><abs>:vej
<1><pl><incl><erg>:vej
<1><pl><incl>><dat>:vej>n
<1><pl><incl>><gen>:vej>ⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><cont>:vej>x
<1><pl><incl><lat>:vej
<1><pl><incl>><ad><lat>:vej>gŏ
<1><pl><incl>><inter><lat>:vej>lŏ
<1><pl><incl><ess>:vej
<1><pl><incl>><ad><ess>:vej>go
<1><pl><incl>><inter><ess>:vej>lo
<1><pl><incl>><abl>:vej>reⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><ad>><abl>:vej>go>reⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><inter>><abl>:vej>lo>reⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><trans>:vej>ğ
<1><pl><incl>><ad>><trans>:vej>go>ğ
<1><pl><incl>><inter>><trans>:vej>lo>ğ
<1><pl><incl>><term>:vej>mciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><ad>><term>:vej>go>mciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><inter>><term>:vej>lo>mciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><apud><lat>:vej>guiħ
<1><pl><incl>><apud><ess>:vej>ciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><apud><abl>:vej>xiⁿ
<1><pl><incl><abs>:vai
<1><pl><incl><erg>:vai
<1><pl><incl>><dat>:vai>n
<1><pl><incl>><gen>:vai>ⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><cont>:vai>x
<1><pl><incl><lat>:vai
<1><pl><incl>><ad><lat>:vai>gŏ
<1><pl><incl>><inter><lat>:vai>lŏ
<1><pl><incl><ess>:vai
<1><pl><incl>><ad><ess>:vai>go
<1><pl><incl>><inter><ess>:vai>lo
<1><pl><incl>><abl>:vai>reⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><ad>><abl>:vai>go>reⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><inter>><abl>:vai>lo>reⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><trans>:vai>ğ
<1><pl><incl>><ad>><trans>:vai>go>ğ
<1><pl><incl>><inter>><trans>:vai>lo>ğ
<1><pl><incl>><term>:vai>mciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><ad>><term>:vai>go>mciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><inter>><term>:vai>lo>mciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><apud><lat>:vai>guiħ
<1><pl><incl>><apud><ess>:vai>ciⁿ
<1><pl><incl>><apud><abl>:vai>xiⁿ
<2><pl><abs>:šu
<2><pl><erg>:ejš
<2><pl>><dat>:šu>n
<2><pl>><gen>:šu>ⁿ
<2><pl>><cont>:šu>x
<2><pl><lat>:šu
<2><pl>><ad><lat>:šu>gŏ
<2><pl>><inter><lat>:šu>lŏ
<2><pl><ess>:šu
<2><pl>><ad><ess>:šu>go
<2><pl>><inter><ess>:šu>lo
<2><pl>><abl>:šu>reⁿ
<2><pl>><ad>><abl>:šu>go>reⁿ
<2><pl>><inter>><abl>:šu>lo>reⁿ
<2><pl>><trans>:šu>ğ
<2><pl>><ad>><trans>:šu>go>ğ
<2><pl>><inter>><trans>:šu>lo>ğ
<2><pl>><term>:šu>mciⁿ
<2><pl>><ad>><term>:šu>go>mciⁿ
<2><pl>><inter>><term>:šu>lo>mciⁿ
<2><pl>><apud><lat>:šu>guiħ
<2><pl>><apud><ess>:šu>ciⁿ
<2><pl>><apud><abl>:šu>xiⁿ
<prox><sg><abs>:e
<prox><sg>><erg>:equ>s
<prox><sg>><erg>:equ>v
<prox><sg>><dat>:equi>n
<prox><sg>><gen>:equi>ⁿ
<prox><sg>><cont>:equ>x
<prox><sg><lat>:equi
<prox><sg>><ad><lat>:equi>gŏ
<prox><sg>><inter><lat>:equi>lŏ
<prox><sg><ess>:equi
<prox><sg>><ad><ess>:equi>go
<prox><sg>><inter><ess>:equi>lo
<prox><sg>><abl>:equi>reⁿ
<prox><sg>><ad>><abl>:equi>go>reⁿ
<prox><sg>><inter>><abl>:equi>lo>reⁿ
<prox><sg>><trans>:equi>ğ
<prox><sg>><ad>><trans>:equi>go>ğ
<prox><sg>><inter>><trans>:equi>lo>ğ
<prox><sg>><term>:equi>mciⁿ
<prox><sg>><ad>><term>:equi>go>mciⁿ
<prox><sg>><inter>><term>:equi>lo>mciⁿ
<prox><sg>><apud><lat>:equi>guiħ
<prox><sg>><apud><ess>:equi>ciⁿ
<prox><sg>><apud><abl>:equi>xiⁿ
<prox><sg>><in><lat>:equi
<prox><sg>><in><ess>:equi
<prox><sg>><in><abl>:equi>reⁿ
<prox><sg>><in><trans>:equi>ğ
<prox><sg>><in><term>:equi>mciⁿ
<med><sg><abs>:is
<med><sg>><erg>:icxu>s
<med><sg>><erg>:icxu>v
<med><sg>><dat>:icxui>n
<med><sg>><gen>:icxui>ⁿ
<med><sg>><cont>:icxu>x
<med><sg><lat>:icxui
<med><sg>><ad><lat>:icxui>gŏ
<med><sg>><inter><lat>:icxui>lŏ
<med><sg><ess>:icxui
<med><sg>><ad><ess>:icxui>go
<med><sg>><inter><ess>:icxui>lo
<med><sg>><abl>:icxui>reⁿ
<med><sg>><ad>><abl>:icxui>go>reⁿ
<med><sg>><inter>><abl>:icxui>lo>reⁿ
<med><sg>><trans>:icxui>ğ
<med><sg>><ad>><trans>:icxui>go>ğ
<med><sg>><inter>><trans>:icxui>lo>ğ
<med><sg>><term>:icxui>mciⁿ
<med><sg>><ad>><term>:icxui>go>mciⁿ
<med><sg>><inter>><term>:icxui>lo>mciⁿ
<med><sg>><apud><lat>:icxui>guiħ
<med><sg>><apud><ess>:icxui>ciⁿ
<med><sg>><apud><abl>:icxui>xiⁿ
<med><sg>><in><lat>:icxui
<med><sg>><in><ess>:icxui
<med><sg>><in><abl>:icxui>reⁿ
<med><sg>><in><trans>:icxui>ğ
<med><sg>><in><term>:icxui>mciⁿ
<dist><sg><abs>:o
<dist><sg>><erg>:oqu>s
<dist><sg>><erg>:oqu>v
<dist><sg>><dat>:oqui>n
<dist><sg>><gen>:oqui>ⁿ
<dist><sg>><cont>:oqu>x
<dist><sg><lat>:oqui
<dist><sg>><ad><lat>:oqui>gŏ
<dist><sg>><inter><lat>:oqui>lŏ
<dist><sg><ess>:oqui
<dist><sg>><ad><ess>:oqui>go
<dist><sg>><inter><ess>:oqui>lo
<dist><sg>><abl>:oqui>reⁿ
<dist><sg>><ad>><abl>:oqui>go>reⁿ
<dist><sg>><inter>><abl>:oqui>lo>reⁿ
<dist><sg>><trans>:oqui>ğ
<dist><sg>><ad>><trans>:oqui>go>ğ
<dist><sg>><inter>><trans>:oqui>lo>ğ
<dist><sg>><term>:oqui>mciⁿ
<dist><sg>><ad>><term>:oqui>go>mciⁿ
<dist><sg>><inter>><term>:oqui>lo>mciⁿ
<dist><sg>><apud><lat>:oqui>guiħ
<dist><sg>><apud><ess>:oqui>ciⁿ
<dist><sg>><apud><abl>:oqui>xiⁿ
<dist><sg>><in><lat>:oqui
<dist><sg>><in><ess>:oqui
<dist><sg>><in><abl>:oqui>reⁿ
<dist><sg>><in><trans>:oqui>ğ
<dist><sg>><in><term>:oqui>mciⁿ
<prox><pl><abs>:ebi
<prox><pl>><erg>:eqar
<prox><pl>><dat>:eqari>n
<prox><pl>><gen>:eqri>ⁿ
<prox><pl>><cont>:eqar>x
<prox><pl><lat>:eqari
<prox><pl>><ad><lat>:eqari>gŏ
<prox><pl>><inter><lat>:eqari>lŏ
<prox><pl><ess>:eqari
<prox><pl>><ad><ess>:eqari>go
<prox><pl>><inter><ess>:eqari>lo
<prox><pl>><abl>:eqari>reⁿ
<prox><pl>><ad>><abl>:eqari>go>reⁿ
<prox><pl>><inter>><abl>:eqari>lo>reⁿ
<prox><pl>><trans>:eqari>ğ
<prox><pl>><ad>><trans>:eqari>go>ğ
<prox><pl>><inter>><trans>:eqari>lo>ğ
<prox><pl>><term>:eqari>mciⁿ
<prox><pl>><ad>><term>:eqari>go>mciⁿ
<prox><pl>><inter>><term>:eqari>lo>mciⁿ
<prox><pl>><apud><lat>:eqari>guiħ
<prox><pl>><apud><ess>:eqari>ciⁿ
<prox><pl>><apud><abl>:eqari>xiⁿ
<prox><pl>><in><lat>:eqari
<prox><pl>><in><ess>:eqari
<prox><pl>><in><abl>:eqari>reⁿ
<prox><pl>><in><trans>:eqari>ğ
<prox><pl>><in><term>:eqari>mciⁿ
<med><pl><abs>:ipsi
<med><pl>><erg>:icxar
<med><pl>><dat>:icxar>n
<med><pl>><gen>:icxri>ⁿ
<med><pl>><cont>:icxar>x
<med><pl><lat>:icxar
<med><pl>><ad><lat>:icxar>gŏ
<med><pl>><inter><lat>:icxar>lŏ
<med><pl><ess>:icxar
<med><pl>><ad><ess>:icxar>go
<med><pl>><inter><ess>:icxar>lo
<med><pl>><abl>:icxar>reⁿ
<med><pl>><ad>><abl>:icxar>go>reⁿ
<med><pl>><inter>><abl>:icxar>lo>reⁿ
<med><pl>><trans>:icxar>ğ
<med><pl>><ad>><trans>:icxar>go>ğ
<med><pl>><inter>><trans>:icxar>lo>ğ
<med><pl>><term>:icxar>mciⁿ
<med><pl>><ad>><term>:icxar>go>mciⁿ
<med><pl>><inter>><term>:icxar>lo>mciⁿ
<med><pl>><apud><lat>:icxar>guiħ
<med><pl>><apud><ess>:icxar>ciⁿ
<med><pl>><apud><abl>:icxar>xiⁿ
<med><pl>><in><lat>:icxar
<med><pl>><in><ess>:icxar
<med><pl>><in><abl>:icxar>reⁿ
<med><pl>><in><trans>:icxar>ğ
<med><pl>><in><term>:icxar>mciⁿ
<dist><pl><abs>:obi
<dist><pl>><erg>:oqar
<dist><pl>><dat>:oqar>n
<dist><pl>><gen>:oqri>ⁿ
<dist><pl>><cont>:oqar>x
<dist><pl><lat>:oqar
<dist><pl>><ad><lat>:oqar>gŏ
<dist><pl>><inter><lat>:oqar>lŏ
<dist><pl><ess>:oqar
<dist><pl>><ad><ess>:oqar>go
<dist><pl>><inter><ess>:oqar>lo
<dist><pl>><abl>:oqar>reⁿ
<dist><pl>><ad>><abl>:oqar>go>reⁿ
<dist><pl>><inter>><abl>:oqar>lo>reⁿ
<dist><pl>><trans>:oqar>ğ
<dist><pl>><ad>><trans>:oqar>go>ğ
<dist><pl>><inter>><trans>:oqar>lo>ğ
<dist><pl>><term>:oqar>mciⁿ
<dist><pl>><ad>><term>:oqar>go>mciⁿ
<dist><pl>><inter>><term>:oqar>lo>mciⁿ
<dist><pl>><apud><lat>:oqar>guiħ
<dist><pl>><apud><ess>:oqar>ciⁿ
<dist><pl>><apud><abl>:oqar>xiⁿ
<dist><pl>><in><lat>:oqar
<dist><pl>><in><ess>:oqar
<dist><pl>><in><abl>:oqar>reⁿ
<dist><pl>><in><trans>:oqar>ğ
<dist><pl>><in><term>:oqar>mciⁿ
<1><sg><poss><abs>:seⁿ
<1><sg><poss><abs>:se
<1><sg><poss><erg>:sečo>v
<1><sg><poss>><dat>:sečo>n
<1><sg><poss>><gen>:sečo>ⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><cont>:sečo>x
<1><sg><poss><lat>:sečo
<1><sg><poss>><ad><lat>:sečo>gŏ
<1><sg><poss>><inter><lat>:sečo>lŏ
<1><sg><poss><ess>:sečo
<1><sg><poss>><ad><ess>:sečo>go
<1><sg><poss>><inter><ess>:sečo>lo
<1><sg><poss>><abl>:sečo>reⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><ad>><abl>:sečo>go>reⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><inter>><abl>:sečo>lo>reⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><trans>:sečo>ğ
<1><sg><poss>><ad>><trans>:sečo>go>ğ
<1><sg><poss>><inter>><trans>:sečo>lo>ğ
<1><sg><poss>><term>:sečo>mciⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><ad>><term>:sečo>go>mciⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><inter>><term>:sečo>lo>mciⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><apud><lat>:sečo>guiħ
<1><sg><poss>><apud><ess>:sečo>ciⁿ
<1><sg><poss>><apud><abl>:sečo>xiⁿ
<2><sg><poss><abs>:ħajⁿ
<2><sg><poss><abs>:ħaj
<2><sg><poss><erg>:ħajčo>v
<2><sg><poss>><dat>:ħajčo>n
<2><sg><poss>><gen>:ħajčo>ⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><cont>:ħajčo>x
<2><sg><poss><lat>:ħajčo
<2><sg><poss>><ad><lat>:ħajčo>gŏ
<2><sg><poss>><inter><lat>:ħajčo>lŏ
<2><sg><poss><ess>:ħajčo
<2><sg><poss>><ad><ess>:ħajčo>go
<2><sg><poss>><inter><ess>:ħajčo>lo
<2><sg><poss>><abl>:ħajčo>reⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><ad>><abl>:ħajčo>go>reⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><inter>><abl>:ħajčo>lo>reⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><trans>:ħajčo>ğ
<2><sg><poss>><ad>><trans>:ħajčo>go>ğ
<2><sg><poss>><inter>><trans>:ħajčo>lo>ğ
<2><sg><poss>><term>:ħajčo>mciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><ad>><term>:ħajčo>go>mciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><inter>><term>:ħajčo>lo>mciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><apud><lat>:ħajčo>guiħ
<2><sg><poss>><apud><ess>:ħajčo>ciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><apud><abl>:ħajčo>xiⁿ
<2><sg><poss><abs>:ħeⁿ
<2><sg><poss><abs>:ħe
<2><sg><poss><erg>:ħečo>v
<2><sg><poss>><dat>:ħečo>n
<2><sg><poss>><gen>:ħečo>ⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><cont>:ħečo>x
<2><sg><poss><lat>:ħečo
<2><sg><poss>><ad><lat>:ħečo>gŏ
<2><sg><poss>><inter><lat>:ħečo>lŏ
<2><sg><poss><ess>:ħečo
<2><sg><poss>><ad><ess>:ħečo>go
<2><sg><poss>><inter><ess>:ħečo>lo
<2><sg><poss>><abl>:ħečo>reⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><ad>><abl>:ħečo>go>reⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><inter>><abl>:ħečo>lo>reⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><trans>:ħečo>ğ
<2><sg><poss>><ad>><trans>:ħečo>go>ğ
<2><sg><poss>><inter>><trans>:ħečo>lo>ğ
<2><sg><poss>><term>:ħečo>mciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><ad>><term>:ħečo>go>mciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><inter>><term>:ħečo>lo>mciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><apud><lat>:ħečo>guiħ
<2><sg><poss>><apud><ess>:ħečo>ciⁿ
<2><sg><poss>><apud><abl>:ħečo>xiⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss><abs>:txeⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss><abs>:txe
<1><pl><excl><poss><erg>:txečo>v
<1><pl><excl><poss>><dat>:txečo>n
<1><pl><excl><poss>><gen>:txečo>ⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><cont>:txečo>x
<1><pl><excl><poss><lat>:txečo
<1><pl><excl><poss>><ad><lat>:txečo>gŏ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><inter><lat>:txečo>lŏ
<1><pl><excl><poss><ess>:txečo
<1><pl><excl><poss>><ad><ess>:txečo>go
<1><pl><excl><poss>><inter><ess>:txečo>lo
<1><pl><excl><poss>><abl>:txečo>reⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><ad>><abl>:txečo>go>reⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><inter>><abl>:txečo>lo>reⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><trans>:txečo>ğ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><ad>><trans>:txečo>go>ğ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><inter>><trans>:txečo>lo>ğ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><term>:txečo>mciⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><ad>><term>:txečo>go>mciⁿ
<1><pl><excl><poss>><inter>><term>:txečo>lo>mciⁿ
